Maine, session 132, LD1705.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §8606-A, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Annual assessment and reporting. The department shall annually assess adult
education needs in the State relative to funding appropriated by the Legislature. By
December 3, 2026 and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over education matters with the
findings of the assessment. The report must include:
A. Funding allocated to each adult education program in the State;
B. The full funding amount that each adult education program in the State is eligible
for and the amount that figure has been prorated by the department;
C. The impact of funding on adult education program outcomes;
D. Additional funding needs;
E. A plan for gradually increasing annual funding to adult education programs in order
to reach 100% of the State's obligation for adult education funding in accordance with
subsection 4; and
F. Recommendations on improvements to adult education.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §8606-A, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Funds not disbursed; justification. If funds appropriated for adult education are
not disbursed in accordance with the reimbursement procedures and rates described in this
section and in section 8607-A, the department shall submit to the Legislature a detailed
written explanation describing the reason the funds were not disbursed and describing the
purpose of the funds.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §8607-B is enacted to read:
§8607-B. Program oversight
Page 1 - 132LR1805(05)

1. Guidelines. The department shall adopt and maintain clear, transparent and
consistent guidelines for the use of state funds for adult education programs to ensure fiscal
responsibility and alignment with state goals.
2. Stakeholder input. Prior to finalizing its budget, the department shall biennially
convene a stakeholder group to provide the department with input on statewide goals for
adult education, funding priorities and statewide program improvements. The stakeholder
group must include, but is not limited to:
A. One or more members that serve as directors of adult education programs in the
State;
B. One or more members representing a statewide adult education professional
association;
C. One or more members that serve as adult education instructors in the State; and
D. One or more members representing adult education students.
Sec. 4. Distribution of funding. The Department of Education may not distribute
any funding attributable to adult education programs through a school administrative unit
starting in fiscal year 2027-28. The department shall distribute all funding associated with
the college transitions programs under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section
15688-A, subsection 2 directly to adult education programs through the subsidy outlined
in Title 20-A, section 8607-A.
Sec. 5. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Adult Education 0364
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to support adult education programs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $150,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $150,000
Page 2 - 132LR1805(05)